apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="elv__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ane</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="doctor__n">
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>es</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="aft/an__n">
  <e>       <p><l>nane</l>  <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nar</l>   <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>anen</l>  <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>an</l>    <r>an<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="g/orn__n">
  <e>       <p><l>arnene</l><r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ornene</l><r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arner</l> <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orner</l> <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orna</l>  <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>orni</l>  <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>orn</l>   <r>orn<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v/om__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>emmene</l><r>om<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommene</l><r>om<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>emmer</l> <r>om<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ommer</l> <r>om<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>omma</l>  <r>om<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ommi</l>  <r>om<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>om</l>    <r>om<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="m/oder__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ødrene</l><r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ødrer</l> <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>odera</l> <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oderi</l> <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oder</l>  <r>oder<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
    
<pardef n="dat/um__n">
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aa</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uma</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>umi</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umen</l>  <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>aa</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ai</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>uma</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>umi</l>   <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>umet</l>  <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>um</l>    <r>um<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="eva__n">
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>   <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>    <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>a</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="cp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="cp-both-s"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="nova">            <i>nova</i><par n="eva__n"/></e>
    <e lm="datum"><i>dat</i><par n="dat/um__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doctor"><i>doctor</i><par n="doctor__n"/></e>
<e lm="julaftan">        <i>julaft</i><par n="aft/an__n"/></e>
<e lm="aftan">           <i>aft</i><par n="aft/an__n"/></e>
